Maine, session 132, LD771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1101, sub-§27 is enacted to read:
27. "Amphetamine" means any compound, mixture or preparation containing
amphetamine in any quantity.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1101, sub-§28 is enacted to read:
28. "Methamphetamine" means any compound, mixture or preparation containing
methamphetamine in any quantity.